Washington statutes.
RCW 10.101.070

County moneys.

The moneys shall be distributed to each county determined to be eligible to receive moneys by the office of public defense as determined under this section. Ninety percent of the funding appropriated shall be designated as "county moneys" and shall be distributed as follows:

(1) Six percent of the county moneys appropriated shall be distributed as a base allocation among the eligible counties. A county's base allocation shall be equal to this six percent divided by the total number of eligible counties.

(2) Ninety-four percent of the county moneys appropriated shall be distributed among the eligible counties as follows:

(a) Fifty percent of this amount shall be distributed on a pro rata basis to each eligible county based upon the population of the county as a percentage of the total population of all eligible counties; and

(b) Fifty percent of this amount shall be distributed on a pro rata basis to each eligible county based upon the annual number of criminal cases filed in the county superior court as a percentage of the total annual number of criminal cases filed in the superior courts of all eligible counties.

(3) Under this section:

(a) The population of the county is the most recent number determined by the office of financial management;

(b) The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county superior court is determined by the most recent annual report of the courts of Washington, as published by the office of the administrator for the courts;

(c) Distributions and eligibility for distributions in the 2005-2007 biennium shall be based on 2004 figures for the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as described under (b) of this subsection. Future distributions shall be based on the most recent figures for the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as described under (b) of this subsection.

[ 2005 c 157 s 5.]